src/import/nouns.lexc
häälevärving+N:hääle#värving VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@hääleõigus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hääle#´õigus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@häälik+N:@P.NomStem.First@häälik VIRSIK ;
häälikulugu+N:hääliku#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@häälikuõpetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hääliku#õpetus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@häälitsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@häälitsus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@häälitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@häälitus OLULINE ;
häältearv+N:häälte#´arv%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@häälteenamus+N:@P.NomStem.First@häälte#enamus OLULINE ;
häältekünnis+N:häälte#kün,nis SOOLANE ;
häältelugemine+N:häälte#lugemine OLULINE ;
häältelugemiskomisjon+N:häälte#lugemis#komisjon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@häärber+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´äärber REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõbe+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõbe HALE ;
hõbedaühend+N:hõbeda#ühend REDEL ;
hõbeheik+N:hõbe#h´eik TAUD ;
hõbekross+N:hõbe#kr´os,s TAUD ;
hõbelind+N:hõbe#l´innD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
hõbelusikas+N:hõbe#lusika LOHAKAS ;
hõbeläik+N:hõbe#l´äik TAUD ;
hõbemedal+N:hõbe#medal REDEL ;
hõbemünt+N:hõbe#m´ün,t TAUD ;
hõbepaber+N:hõbe#paber REDEL ;
hõbepaju+N:hõbe#paju KAVA ;
hõberaha+N:hõbe#raha KAVA ;
hõberubla+N:hõbe#rubla RUBLA ;
hõberublatükk+N:hõbe#rubla#t´ükk TAUD ;
hõbeseekel+N:hõbe#s´eekE2l REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõbetis+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõbetis OLULINE ;
hõbetukat+N:hõbe#tukat REDEL ;
hõbetükk+N:hõbe#t´ükk TAUD ;
hõbeuur+N:hõbe#´uur TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõigatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõigatus OLULINE ;
hõik+N:h´õik%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
hõikaja+N:h´õikaja AASTA ;
hõim+N:h´õim%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
hõimkond+N:h´õimk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
hõimlane+N:h´õimlane SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõimlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õimlus SUULINE ;
hõimuliit+N:hõimu#l´iit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
hõimuline+N:hõimuline OLULINE ;
hõimurahvas+N:hõimu#r´ahva KOTKAS ;
hõimutava+N:hõimu#tava KAVA ;
hõisk+N:h´õisK1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
hõiskamine+N:h´õiskamine OLULINE ;
hõivamine+N:h´õivamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõivang+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõivang VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõivar+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õivar REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõivatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõivatus OLULINE ;
hõive+N:h´õive PINGE ;
hõlbustamine+N:hõlbustamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlbustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõlbustus OLULINE ;
hõlje+N:h´õl,je PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõljuk+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõl,juk REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõljum+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õl,jum REDEL ;
hõljumine+N:h´õl,jumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõllandus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõllandus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlm+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õlm%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlmavus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õlmavus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlmik+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõl,mik VIRSIK ;
hõlmikpuu+N:hõl,mik#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlp+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õlp%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlpsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õlpsus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõlst+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õl,st TAUD ;
hõlvamine+N:h´õlvamine OLULINE ;
hõng+N:h´õng%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõngus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õngus SUULINE ;
hõngushäälik+N:h´õngus#häälik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõredus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõredus OLULINE ;
hõrendamine+N:hõrendamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõrendatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõrendatus SUULINE ;
hõrendik+N:h`õrend´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõrendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõrendus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõrgutis+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõrgutis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõrgutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõrgutus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõrkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õrkus SUULINE ;
hõrnas+N:h´õrna KOTKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõg+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õõg%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
hõõgamine+N:h´õõgamine OLULINE ;
hõõgumine+N:h´õõgumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõgus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õõgus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõgutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõõgutus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõr+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õõr%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
hõõrdpidur+N:h´õõrd#pidur REDEL ;
hõõrdpind+N:h´õõrd#p´innD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
hõõrdumine+N:h´õõrdumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõrdumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õõrdumus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõrduvus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´õõrduvus OLULINE ;
hõõre+N:h´õõrD1e PINGE ;
hõõrel+N:h´õõrE2l MAGUS ;
hõõrits+N:hõõrits MAGUS ;
hõõrmed+N:h´õõrE2 HAARE ;
hõõrumine+N:h´õõrumine OLULINE ;
hõõruti+N:hõõruti AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hõõtsik+N:@P.NomStem.First@hõõtsik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@hööritus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hööritus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@höövel+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´öövE2l REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@hööveldus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hööveldus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüaliin+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüal´iin TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüatsint+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüats´in,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hübriid+N:@P.NomStem.First@hübr´iid TAUD ;
hüdra+N:hüdra RUBLA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdraat+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüdr´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdrant+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüdr´an,t TAUD ;
hüdraulika+N:hüdr`aulika AASTA ;
hüdreemia+N:hüdr´eemia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdriid+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüdr´iid TAUD ;
hüdroelektrijaam+N:hüdro#el´ektri#j´aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
hüdrofosfaat+N:hüdro#fosf´aat TAUD ;
hüdrograaf+N:hüdro#gr´aaf TAUD ;
hüdrograafia+N:hüdro#gr´aafia AASTA ;
hüdrokarbonaat+N:hüdro#k`arbon´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdroksiid+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üdroks´iid TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdroloog+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üdrol´oog TAUD ;
hüdroloogia+N:hüdrol´oogia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdrolüüs+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üdrol´üüs TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdroplaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üdropl´aan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüdrosool+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üdros´ool TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hügieen+N:@P.NomStem.First@hügi´een TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hügieenilisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hügi`eenilisus OLULINE ;
hügieeninõue+N:hügi`eeni#n´õuD1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hügroskoop+N:@P.NomStem.First@hügro#sk´oop TAUD ;
hüljatu+N:hül,jatu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüljatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hül,jatus OLULINE ;
hüljes+N:h´ül,J1G1e KOTKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@hülss+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´ül,ss TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hümn+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´ümn TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpak+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpak VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpatus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüperboloid+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüperbol´oid TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüperbool+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üperb´ool TAUD ;
hüperborealane+N:hüperbor´ealane SUULINE ;
hüperesteesia+N:hüperest´eesia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüperon+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüperon TAUD ;
hüpertensioon+N:hüper#tensi´oon TAUD ;
hüpertoonia+N:hüper#t´oonia AASTA ;
hüpertooniahaige+N:hüper#t´oonia#h´aige AASTA ;
hüpertooniatõbi+N:hüper#t´oonia#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
hüpertoonik+N:hüper#toonik VIRSIK ;
hüpertroofia+N:hüper#tr´oofia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpik+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpik VIRSIK ;
hüpiklane+N:hüpiklane OLULINE ;
hüpiknukk+N:hüpik#n´ukk%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
hüpits+N:hüpits MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpitus OLULINE ;
hüpleja+N:h´üpleja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüplikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@h´üpli´kkus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpnoos+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpn´oos TAUD ;
hüpnotism+N:hüpnot´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpnotisöör+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpnotis´öör TAUD ;
hüpohondria+N:hüpoh´ondria AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpohondrik+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpoh`ondrik VIRSIK ;
hüpoksia+N:hüp´oksia AASTA ;
hüpoplaasia+N:hüpo#pl´aasia AASTA ;
hüpostaas+N:hüpo#st´aas TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpoteek+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üpot´eek TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpotees+N:@P.NomStem.First@h`üpot´ees TAUD ;
hüpotensioon+N:hüpo#tensi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüpotenuus+N:@P.NomStem.First@hüpoten´uus TAUD ;
hüpotermia+N:hüpot´ermia AASTA ;
hüpotoonia+N:hüpot´oonia AASTA ;
hüpotooniahaige+N:hüpot´oonia#h´aige AASTA ;
hüpotooniatõbi+N:hüpot´oonia#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
hüpotroofia+N:hüpo#tr´oofia AASTA ;
hüpotsenter+N:hüpo#ts´entE2r REDEL ;
hüppaja+N:h´üppaja AASTA ;
hüppamine+N:h´üppamine OLULINE ;
hüppeasend+N:h´üppe#asend REDEL ;
hüppeliiges+N:h´üppe#liiges SOOLANE ;
